Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1906
Effective date of document.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a document is effective:

(1) At the time of filing on the date it is filed, as evidenced by the Secretary of State's endorsement on the original document; or

(2) At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

(b) A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the ninetieth day after the date filed.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 6.